Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2506
Commissioner; establish fee schedules; administer act.

(1) The commissioner shall, after a public hearing conducted by the commissioner or his or her designee, establish a reasonable schedule of fees for licenses, permits, certificates, and inspections authorized under the Conveyance Safety Act. The commissioner shall establish the fees at a level necessary to meet the costs of administering the act. Inspection fee schedules relating to the inspection of conveyances adopted by the commissioner prior to January 1, 2008, shall continue to be effective until they are amended or repealed by the commissioner.

(2) The commissioner shall administer the Conveyance Safety Act. It is the intent of the Legislature that, beginning in fiscal year 2008-09, the funding for the administration of the act shall be entirely from cash funds remitted to the Mechanical Safety Inspection Fund that are fees collected in the administration of the act.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB265, § 29.